lexc/adj/enhuadjmnevek.lexc
LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam111;
LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11e§k    Gen;
                            Gen111;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;
LEXICON Fam111
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen111;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
LEXICON Gen111
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case111;
  
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
!+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez211§t       #;  ! at, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoe§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Case111
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
!+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t       #;  ! at, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

Lexicon Tocase1
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Possm;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Plurm;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Famm;

LEXICON Possm
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famm;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Famm;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famm;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Famm;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famm;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famm;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famm;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Famm;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famm;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famm;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famm;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famm;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famm;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famm;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famm;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famm;
LEXICON Plurm
!+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genm;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Genm;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11e§k    Genm;
                            Genm1;

LEXICON Famm
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genm;
                       Genm1;

!Use Case of Tocase/Tocase1

LEXICON Genm
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
  
LEXICON Genm1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case1;

LEXICON Case1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
!+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
							Ik;


LEXICON AddAdji
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1i;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocasei;


LEXICON AddAdjihue
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1i;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§ebb Tocase1i;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocasei;


Lexicon Tocasei
[stem]+Adj:0     Possi;
[stem]+Adj:0     Pluri;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fami;


LEXICON Possi
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Sup:^+cSup^§AA§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fami;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fami;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fami;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fami;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fami;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fami;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fami;   ! aim
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPJ§§AE§im   Fami;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fami;   ! aid
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPJ§§AE§id   Fami;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fami;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPJ§§AE§i   Fami;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fami;   ! aink, eink
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPJ§§AE§ink   Fami;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fami;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPJ§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fami;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fami;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPJ§§AE§ik   Fami;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fami;

LEXICON Pluri
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Geni;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoeadjoe§k    Geni; 
                            Geni;

LEXICON Fami
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Geni;
                       Geni;

LEXICON Geni
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casei;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casei;
                       Casei;

LEXICON Adj2num
éltű AddAdji;
LEXICON Adj3igek
flekkenező AddAdji;
javallatú AddAdji;
prüszköltető AddAdji;
történetű AddAdji;
ügyeletű AddAdji;
LEXICON Adj
adalberti AddAdji;
adózásbeli AddAdji;
ajánlású AddAdji;
alakhű AddAdjihue;
alapbeli AddAdji;
alapárú AddAdji;
alkonyú AddAdji;
alternáló AddAdji;
antikizáló AddAdji;
aranyfogú AddAdji;
aromájú AddAdji;
auffenbergi AddAdji;
bakonycsernyei AddAdji;
bankbeli AddAdji;
beckeri AddAdji;
belvilágú AddAdji;
berentei AddAdji;
bethleni AddAdji;
betűhű AddAdjihue;
bilibéli AddAdji;
biztosítású AddAdji;
bolygórendszeri AddAdji;
borítású AddAdji;
budejovicei AddAdji;
bárpultszerű AddAdji;
bényei AddAdji;
bölcskei AddAdji;
bőrbeli AddAdji;
ceredi AddAdji;
civilizációjú AddAdji;
csatolású AddAdji;
csendű AddAdji;
csillagfényű AddAdji;
csomójú AddAdji;
császárhű AddAdjihue;
császártöltési AddAdji;
csúcsfeszültségű AddAdji;
czelei AddAdji;
címszerepbeli AddAdji;
dehonesztáló AddAdji;
devichi AddAdji;
diplomatervezői AddAdji;
doktoráltató AddAdji;
drótkerítésféle AddAdji;
dézsabeli AddAdji;
dörzshajtású AddAdji;
egeri AddAdji;
egyetértő AddAdji;
együgyű AddAdji;
elevenszülő AddAdji;
elsőszülöttségi AddAdji;
elvhű AddAdjihue;
emberábrázolású AddAdji;
energiaellátású AddAdji;
erdőkitermelési AddAdji;
ernyősvirágzatú AddAdji;
estebédi AddAdji;
etikettbéli AddAdji;
faanyagú AddAdji;
falkabeli AddAdji;
fattyúnyelvi AddAdji;
fehérnemű AddAdji;
fektéri AddAdji;
felpéci AddAdji;
fiatornyú AddAdji;
foglalkozásbeli AddAdji;
formatervezésű AddAdji;
fárszi AddAdji;
fényáramú AddAdji;
fülesdi AddAdji;
főösszegű AddAdji;
gerincvezetéki AddAdji;
gorillaarcú AddAdji;
gyermekszínészi AddAdji;
gyújtáselosztó AddAdji;
gödrei AddAdji;
hagyományformáló AddAdji;
hammingi AddAdji;
harmadfokú AddAdji;
hatékonyságú AddAdji;
hempergő AddAdji;
hihető AddAdji;
hithű AddAdjihue;
hollétű AddAdji;
hulladékmentesítő AddAdji;
házelnöki AddAdji;
húshozamú AddAdji;
hű AddAdjihue;
idei AddAdji;
iklanberényi AddAdji;
inkarnációbeli AddAdji;
iskolájú AddAdji;
jegyvizsgáló AddAdji;
jogrendbeli AddAdji;
jóreménységi AddAdji;
kanyarító AddAdji;
kataszteri AddAdji;
kenderföldi AddAdji;
keszegező AddAdji;
királyhű AddAdjihue;
királynői AddAdji;
klasszisbeli AddAdji;
koncseki AddAdji;
korhű AddAdjihue;
korrózióálló AddAdji;
kunczei AddAdji;
kékkői AddAdji;
készítésű AddAdji;
kölcsönű AddAdji;
körutazó AddAdji;
közfunkciójú AddAdji;
középrétegbeli AddAdji;
kőrösi AddAdji;
laufenauneri AddAdji;
lendületű AddAdji;
lippi AddAdji;
lánghegesztési AddAdji;
léleknevelő AddAdji;
macskaszemű AddAdji;
magántulajdonú AddAdji;
meddő AddAdji;
mendliki AddAdji;
mezsgyéjű AddAdji;
modellező AddAdji;
mozgófényképező AddAdji;
márkú AddAdji;
mérethű AddAdjihue;
mérművű AddAdji;
műtermi AddAdji;
nagyothallású AddAdji;
nehéziparosító AddAdji;
novelli AddAdji;
nyomozásbeli AddAdji;
népfelségi AddAdji;
ockeri AddAdji;
orfeumbeli AddAdji;
palackkirakó AddAdji;
patkóbélbeli AddAdji;
petschaueri AddAdji;
pluszjövedelmi AddAdji;
pragmatikájú AddAdji;
pusztaedericsi AddAdji;
párthű AddAdjihue;
pénzfelvételi AddAdji;
raklapozható AddAdji;
relativitású AddAdji;
rendszerhű AddAdjihue;
rezi AddAdji;
rottenbilleri AddAdji;
részlettervi AddAdji;
sallangmentes AddAdji;
schönherzi AddAdji;
sikertelenségű AddAdji;
sorszámozású AddAdji;
struktúrájú AddAdji;
szakfelelősi AddAdji;
szavazattöbbségű AddAdji;
szemléltetésű AddAdji;
szereplésű AddAdji;
szimpátiájú AddAdji;
száhlenderi AddAdji;
századbéli AddAdji;
színlelt AddAdji;
szögligeti AddAdji;
sáfrányszínű AddAdji;
sötétségbeli AddAdji;
talárú AddAdji;
tartású AddAdji;
teltségű AddAdji;
terménytőzsdei AddAdji;
természethű AddAdjihue;
thaiföldi AddAdji;
tollú AddAdji;
tudatformáló AddAdji;
tányérsapkájú AddAdji;
téglalapú AddAdji;
többnejű AddAdji;
törvényszéki AddAdji;
tűzgyorsaságú AddAdji;
vadízű AddAdji;
valósághű AddAdjihue;
vegyjelű AddAdji;
vetésterületi AddAdji;
világosságbeli AddAdji;
volumenbeli AddAdji;
vámraktárszerű AddAdji;
végtisztességi AddAdji;
vízcseppnyi AddAdji;
weindli AddAdji;
zenetörténeti AddAdji;
zászlószentelési AddAdji;
állatmesei AddAdji;
árnyalatbeli AddAdji;
égerszögi AddAdji;
élethű AddAdjihue;
élettapasztalatú AddAdji;
érintési AddAdji;
ételszagú AddAdji;
óradíjú AddAdji;
önköltségű AddAdji;
össznemzeti AddAdji;
üdültetési AddAdji;
üzemszervezési AddAdji;
